Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3406
Attorney in fact; disqualification.

None of the following may serve as an attorney in fact:

(1) The attending physician or a member of the mental health treatment team of the principal;

(2) An employee of the attending physician or a member of the mental health treatment team of the principal who is unrelated to the principal by blood, marriage, or adoption;

(3) A person unrelated to the principal by blood, marriage, or adoption who is an owner, operator, or employee of a health care provider in or of which the principal is a patient or resident; and

(4) A person unrelated to the principal by blood, marriage, or adoption if, at the time of the proposed designation, he or she is presently serving as an attorney in fact for ten or more principals.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB247, § 18.